Illinois, session 104th, HB1699.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 13.5 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/13.5)7    Sec. 13.5. Sewage works; operator certification. 8    (a) For the purposes of this Section, the term "sewage 9works" includes, without limitation, wastewater treatment 10works, pretreatment works, and sewers and collection systems.11    (b) The Agency may establish and enforce standards for the 12definition and certification of the technical competency of 13personnel who operate sewage works, and for ascertaining that 14sewage works are under the supervision of trained individuals 15whose qualifications have been approved by the Agency.16    (c) The Agency may issue certificates of competency to 17persons meeting the standards of technical competency 18established by the Agency under this Section, and may 19promulgate and enforce regulations pertaining to the issuance 20and use of those certificates.21    (d) The Agency shall administer the certification program 22established under this Section. The Agency may enter into 23formal working agreements with other departments or agencies   HB1699 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10050 BDA 20121 b1of State or local government under which all or portions of its 2authority under this Section may be delegated to the 3cooperating department or agency.4    (e) This Section and the changes made to subdivision 5(a)(4) of Section 13 by this amendatory Act of the 93rd General 6Assembly do not invalidate the operator certification rules 7previously adopted by the Agency and codified as Part 380 of 8Title 35, Subtitle C, Chapter II of the Illinois 9Administrative Code. Those rules, as amended from time to 10time, shall continue in effect until they are superseded or 11repealed.12    (f) The Agency shall establish an operator-in-training 13wastewater-operator program through which an applicant who 14does not possess a high school diploma or its equivalent may 15act as an operator-in-training working under a certified 16wastewater operator if the applicant demonstrates all of the 17following:18        (1) The applicant is capable of performing the 19    required duties without endangering the health and 20    well-being of the populace.21        (2) The applicant is capable of maintaining and 22    properly operating the structures and equipment entrusted 23    to the applicant's care.24        (3) The applicant is capable of conducting and 25    maintaining the facility in a safe manner.26        (4) The applicant has passed any examinations that are   HB1699 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10050 BDA 20121 b1    required by the Agency to be considered an operator in 2    training.3        (5) The applicant must work under the direct 4    supervision of a certified operator who holds a 5    certificate of technical competency of the appropriate 6    class for the wastewater treatment or pretreatment works. 7    The Agency may adopt any rules needed to implement this 8subsection (f). 9(Source: P.A. 93-170, eff. 7-10-03.) 10    Section 10. The Public Water Supply Operations Act is 11amended by changing Section 14 as follows: 12    (415 ILCS 45/14)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 514)13    Sec. 14. Every community water supply operator certified 14by the Agency shall be capable of performing his or her duties 15without endangering the health and well being of the populace; 16shall be able to read and write English; and shall produce 17evidence acceptable to the Agency as to his or her character 18and his or her ability to maintain and operate properly the 19structures and equipment entrusted to the operator's care. In 20addition, water supply operators shall be certified as Class 21"A", Class "B", Class "C", Class "D" operators in accordance 22with classes based on the level of competency determined by 23examination and in accordance with educational and experience 24levels as follows:  HB1699 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10050 BDA 20121 b1    (a) Class "A" and Class "B" Water Supply Operator 2Certificates require graduation from high school or equivalent 3and not less than 3 years of acceptable study, training, and 4responsible experience in water supply operation or management 5as described in Sections 13 and 14 of this Act.6    (b)  Class "C" Water Supply Operator Certificates require 7graduation from high school or the equivalent and not less 8than one year of acceptable study, training, and responsible 9experience in water supply operation or management as 10described in Sections 13 and 14 of this Act.11    (c)  Class "D" Water Supply Operator Certificates require 12graduation from high school or equivalent and not less than 6 13months of acceptable study, training, and responsible 14experience in water supply operation or management as 15described in Sections 13 and 14 of this Act.16    (d) The requirement for graduation from high school or the 17equivalent shall be waived for community water supply 18operators certified prior to the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 91st General Assembly and for community 20water supply operators certified under Section 19(a) of this 21Act.22    (e) The Agency shall establish an operator-in-training 23community water-supply operator program through which an 24applicant who does not possess a high school diploma or its 25equivalent may act as an operator-in-training working under a 26certified community water-supply operator if the applicant   HB1699 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10050 BDA 20121 b1demonstrates all of the following:2        (1) The applicant is capable of performing the 3    required duties without endangering the health and 4    well-being of the populace.5        (2) The applicant is capable of maintaining and 6    properly operating the structures and equipment entrusted 7    to the applicant's care.8        (3) The applicant is capable of conducting and 9    maintaining the water treatment or distribution processes 10    in a manner which will provide safe, potable water for 11    human consumption.12        (4) The applicant has submitted evidence of good 13    character. The Agency shall consider the violation of any 14    of the following statutes as evidence of poor character:15            (A) Section 44 of the Illinois Environmental 16        Protection Act;17            (B) Section 29D-14.9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 18        (terrorism);19            (C) Section 29D-15.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 20        (causing a catastrophe); or21            (D) Section 29D-20 of the Criminal Code of 2012 22        (making a terrorist threat).23        (5) The applicant has passed any examinations that are 24    required for the specific certification required for the 25    certified community water supply operator under whom the 26    operator-in-training is working.  HB1699 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10050 BDA 20121 b1        (6) The applicant must work under the direct 2    supervision of a responsible operator in charge for the 3    community water supply.4    The Agency may adopt rules to implement this subsection 5(e). 6(Source: P.A. 91-84, eff. 7-9-99.)